West Virginia, session 2026, HB4995.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: CHAPTER 18. EDUCATION. ARTICLE 20. EDUCATION OF EXCEPTIONAL CHILDREN. §18-20-11. Video cameras required in certain special education classrooms; audio recording devices required in restroom of a self-contained classroom. (a) A local educational agency (LEA) shall ensure placement of video cameras in self-contained classrooms and audio recording devices in the restrooms of self-contained classrooms as defined in state board policy.(b) As used in this section:(1) "Incident" means a raised suspicion by a teacher, aide, parent, or guardian of a student, of bullying, abuse, or neglect of a student or of harm to an employee of a public school by:(A) An employee of a public school or local educational agency (LEA); or(B) Another student;(2) "Self-contained classroom" means a classroom at a public school in which a majority of the students in regular attendance are provided special education instruction and as further defined in state board policy; and(3) "Special education" means the same as defined in §18-20-1 et seq. of this code.(c) (1) A local educational agency (LEA) shall provide a video camera to a public school for each self-contained classroom that is a part of that school which shall be used in every self-contained classroom.(2) Prior to August 1, 2023, a local educational agency (LEA) shall provide an audio recording device to a public school to be used in the restroom of each self-contained classroom that is a part of that school. If the public school is not able to receive the audio recording device by August 1, 2023, the public school may apply to the state Department of Education for a waiver to extend that date to August 1, 2024.(3) The principal of the school or other school administrator whom the principal assigns as a designee shall be the custodian of the video camera and audio recording device, all recordings generated by the video camera and audio recording device, and access to those recordings pursuant to this section.(d)(1) Every public school that receives a video camera under this section shall operate and maintain the video camera in every self-contained classroom that is part of that school.(2) Every public school that receives an audio recording device under this section shall operate and maintain the audio recording device in every restroom that is a part of a self-contained classroom that is part of that school: Provided, That each restroom of a self-contained classroom shall have posted on its door a notice that states: "Pursuant to state law, this restroom is equipped with an audio recording device for the protection of the students."(3) If there is an interruption in the operation of the video camera or audio recording device for any reason, a written explanation should be submitted to the school principal and the local educational agency (LEA) board explaining the reason and length for which there was no recording. The explanation shall be maintained at the local educational agency (LEA) board office for at least one year. Notice shall also be provided to any parent or guardian whose child was present at the time of the interruption.(e)(1) A video camera placed in a self-contained classroom shall be capable of:(A) Monitoring all areas of the self-contained classroom, including, without limitation, a room attached to the self-contained classroom and used for other purposes; and(B) Recording audio from all areas of the self-contained classroom, including, without limitation, a room attached to the self-contained classroom and used for other purposes.(2) A video camera placed in a self-contained classroom shall not monitor a restroom or any other area in the self-contained classroom where a student changes his or her clothes except, for incidental monitoring of a minor portion of a restroom or other area where a student changes his or her clothes because of the layout of the self-contained classroom.(3) An audio recording device shall be placed in the restroom of the self-contained classroom and notice provided pursuant to §18-20-11(d)(2) of this code. (4) A video camera or audio recording device required by this section is not required to be in operation during the time in which students are not present in the self-contained classroom.(f) Before a public school initially places a video camera in a self-contained classroom or an audio recording device in the restroom of a self-contained classroom pursuant to this section, the local educational agency (LEA) shall provide written notice of the placement, including a written copy of this section of code, to:(1) The parent or legal guardian of a student who is assigned to the self-contained classroom: Provided, That the parent or guardian be allowed the opportunity to opt out of the bathroom audio monitoring for their student. An Individual Education Plan or 504 plan shall outline the opt out and an alternative arrangement for the student or parent needs and requested accommodation; and(2) The school employee(s) who is assigned to work with one or more students in the self-contained classroom.(g)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, a public school shall retain video and audio recorded pursuant to this section for at least three months after the date of the recording, subject to the following:(A) If the minimum three-month period overlaps the summer break occurring between the last day of one instructional term and the first day of the next instructional term, the minimum three-month period shall be extended by the number of days occurring between the two instructional terms;(B) For any school-based camera system or audio device recording device that is installed or replaced after April 1, 2022, the public school shall retain video recorded from a camera or audio device recording for at least 365 days after the date the video or audio was recorded and no extension of this time period during the summer break is required.(2) If a person requests to review a recording under subsection (k) or subsection (l) of this section, the public school shall retain the recording from the date of the request until:(A) The earlier of the person reviewing the recording or 60 days after the person who requested the video or audio recording was notified by the public school that the video or audio recording is available; and(B) Any investigation and any administrative or legal proceedings that result from the recording have been completed, including, without limitation, the exhaustion of all appeals.(3) In no event may the recording be deleted or otherwise made unretrievable before the time period set forth in subdivision (1) of this subsection elapses.(h) This section does not:(1) Waive any immunity from liability of a public local educational agency (LEA) or employee of a public local educational agency (LEA);(2) Create any liability for a cause of action against a public school or local educational agency (LEA) or employee of a public school or local educational agency (LEA); or(3) Require the principal or other designated school administrator to review the recording absent an authorized request pursuant to this code section or suspicion of an incident except as otherwise provided in subsection (j) of this section.(i) A public school or local educational agency (LEA) shall not use video or audio recorded under this section for(1) Teacher evaluations: Provided, That this subdivision does not prohibit the use of video or audio recordings under this section for purposes of the suspension and dismissal of school personnel pursuant to §18A-2-8 of this code; or (2) Any purpose other than the promotion and protection of the health, wellbeing, and safety of students receiving special education and related services in a self-contained classroom or restroom of a self-contained classroom.(j) Except as provided under subsections (k) and (l) of this section, a recording made under this section is confidential and shall not be released or reviewed by anyone except the school principal, other school administration designee, or local educational agency (LEA) designee if the school principal or other school administration designee is unable to review the video or audio recording pursuant to this subsection. The school principal, other school administration designee, or local educational agency (LEA) designee shall review no less than 15 minutes of the video and no less than 15 minutes of audio of each self-contained classroom and restroom at the school no less than every  30 calendar days. The state board shall include in its rule authorized by this section requirements for documentation of compliance with the video and audio reviewing requirements of this subsection.(k) Within seven days of receiving a request, a public school or local educational agency (LEA) shall allow review of a recording by:(1) A public school or local educational agency (LEA) employee who is involved in an alleged incident that is documented by the recording and has been reported to the public school or local educational agency (LEA);(2) A parent or legal guardian of a student who is involved in an alleged incident that is documented by the recording and has been reported to the public school or local educational agency (LEA); or(3) An employee of a public school or local educational agency (LEA) as part of an investigation into an alleged incident that is documented by the recording and has been reported to the public school or local educational agency (LEA).(l) Within seven days of receiving a request, a public school or local educational agency (LEA) shall allow review of a recording by and comply with all subsequent requests for review or release of the recording, by:(1) A law-enforcement officer or employee of the Department of Human Services, as part of an investigation into an alleged incident that is documented by the recording and has been reported to the agency: Provided, That if a release of the recording is requested pursuant to this subdivision, the agency receiving a copy of the recording shall maintain strict confidentiality of the recording and not further release the recording without authorization from the public local educational agency (LEA) through its superintendent; or(2) A judge, counsel, or other legal entity that is charged with deciding or representing either the school board, students, or employees in any matters related to legal issues arising from an incident: Provided, That the recording may only be released pursuant to an appropriate protective order or under seal. (m) If an incident is discovered while initially reviewing a recording that requires a report to be made under §49-2-803 of this code, that report shall be made by the reviewer pursuant to that section within 24 hours of viewing the incident.(n) When a recording is under review as part of the investigation of an alleged incident, and the recording reveals a student violating a disciplinary code or rule of the school, which violation is not related to the alleged incident for which the review is occurring, and which violation is not already the subject of a disciplinary action against the student, the student is not subject to disciplinary action by the school for such unrelated violation unless it reveals a separate incident as described in §18-20-11(b)(1) of this code. (o) It is not a violation of subsection (j) of this section if a contractor or other employee of a public school or local educational agency (LEA) incidentally reviews a recording under this section if the contractor or employee of a public school or local educational agency (LEA) is performing job duties related to the:(1) Installation, operation, or maintenance of video or audio equipment; or(2) Retention of video or audio recordings.(p) This section applies solely to cameras and audio recording devices installed pursuant to this code section and does not limit the access of a student’s parent or legal guardian to a recording reviewable under the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974, 20 U.S.C. §1232g, or any other law.(q) A public school or local educational agency (LEA) shall:(1) Take necessary precautions to conceal the identity of a student who appears in a video recording but is not involved in the alleged incident documented by the video recording for which the public school allows viewing under subsection (j) of this section, including, without limitation, blurring the face of the uninvolved student; and(2) Provide procedures to protect the confidentiality of student records contained in a recording in accordance with the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974, 20 U.S.C. §1232g, or any other law.(r) (1) Any aggrieved person may appeal to the State Board of Education an action by a public school or local educational agency (LEA) that the person believes to be in violation of this section.(2) The state board shall grant a hearing on an appeal under this subsection within 45 days of receiving the appeal.(s) (1) A public school or local educational agency (LEA) may use funds distributed from the Safe Schools Fund created in §18-5-48 of this code or any other available funds to meet the requirements of this section.(2) A public school or local educational agency (LEA) may accept gifts, grants, or donations to meet the requirements of this section.(t) The state board may promulgate a rule in accordance with §29A-3B-1 et seq. of this code to clarify the requirements of this section and address any unforeseen issues that might arise relating to the implementation of the requirements of this section. CHAPTER 18A. SCHOOL PERSONNEL. ARTICLE 2. SCHOOL PERSONNEL. §18A-2-8. Suspension and dismissal of school personnel by board; appeal. (a)(1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, a board may suspend or dismiss any person in its employment at any time for: Immorality, incompetency, cruelty, insubordination, intemperance, willful neglect of duty, unsatisfactory performance, a finding of abuse by the Department of Human Services in accordance with §49-1-1 et seq. of this code, the conviction of a misdemeanor or a guilty plea or a plea of nolo contendere to a misdemeanor charge that has a rational nexus between the conduct and performance of the employee's job, the conviction of a felony or a guilty plea or a plea of nolo contendere to a felony charge. Upon the commencement of any fact-finding investigation involving conduct alleged to jeopardize the health, safety, or welfare of students or the learning environment of other students, whether being conducted internally, or in cooperation with police or Department of Human Services, the affected employee shall be suspended, placed on administrative leave, or reassigned to duties which do not involve direct interaction with pupils.(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed as relieving a board or a local educational agency of its duty to conduct an independent investigation and review of an allegation of abuse of a child in the absence of either a finding of abuse by the Department of Human Services in accordance with §49-1-1 et seq. of this code or the initiation of proceedings for a felony or misdemeanor charge against the person.(b) A charge of unsatisfactory performance shall not be made except as the result of an employee performance evaluation pursuant to §18A-2-12 of this code. The charges shall be stated in writing served upon the employee within two days of presentation of the charges to the board.(c) The affected employee shall be given an opportunity, within five days of receiving the written notice, to request, in writing, a level three hearing and appeals pursuant to the provisions of §6C-2-1 et seq. of this code, except that dismissal for a finding of abuse or the conviction of a felony or guilty plea or plea of nolo contendere to a felony charge is not by itself a grounds for a grievance proceeding. An employee charged with the commission of a felony, a misdemeanor with a rational nexus between the conduct and performance of the employee's job, or child abuse shall be suspended, placed on administrative leave, or reassigned to duties which do not involve direct interaction with pupils pending final disposition of the charges.(d) A county board of education has the duty and authority to provide a safe and secure environment in which students may learn and prosper; therefore, it may take necessary steps to suspend or dismiss any person in its employment at any time should the health, safety, or welfare of students be jeopardized or the learning environment of other students has been impacted. A county board shall complete an investigation of an employee that involves evidence that the employee may have engaged in conduct that jeopardizes the health, safety, or welfare of students despite the employee's resignation from employment prior to completion of the investigation.(e) It shall be the duty of any school principal to report any employee conduct alleged to jeopardize the health, safety, or welfare of students or the learning environment of other students, to the county superintendent within 24 hours of the allegation. Nothing in this subsection supersedes §49-2-803 of this code or the provisions therein regarding mandated reporting of child abuse and neglect.(f) It shall be the duty of any county superintendent to report any employee suspended or dismissed, or resigned during the course of an investigation of the employee's alleged misconduct, in accordance with this section, including the rationale for the suspension or dismissal, to the state superintendent within seven business days of the suspension, dismissal, or resignation. The state superintendent shall maintain a database of all individuals suspended or dismissed for jeopardizing the health, safety, or welfare of students, or for impacting the learning environment of other students. The database shall also include the rationale for the suspension or dismissal. The database shall be confidential and shall only be accessible to county human resource directors, county superintendents, and the state superintendent of schools.(g) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, a suspended employee may not be barred from attending public events on school property while serving the suspension, nor may a suspended employee who has a dependent child, grandchild, foster child, or other family member be barred from entering the school to exercise normal functions of a parent or guardian while suspended: Provided, That the suspended employ’s presence does not jeopardize the health, safety, or welfare of students, employees, or visitors; impact the learning environment or the school-sponsored activity; prejudice an investigation or disciplinary proceedings involving the employee; violate an order of a court or any law; or threaten damage to property.The Clerk of the House of Delegates and the Clerk of the Senate hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates  		............................................................... Clerk of the Senate				                  Originated in the House of Delegates. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  						............................................................... President of the Senate  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2026.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home